Mississippi, session 2026, SB2707.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 9-21-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-21-1.  The Administrative Office of Courts is hereby created.  The purpose of the Administrative Office of Courts shall be to assist in the efficient administration of the nonjudicial business of the courts of the state and in improving the administration of justice in Mississippi by performing the duties and exercising the powers as provided in this chapter. As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term "court" means any tribunal recognized as a part of the judicial branch of government, but not including county boards of supervisors. SECTION 2.  Section 9-21-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-21-3.  (1)  The Administrative Office of Courts shall be specifically charged with the duty of assisting the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Mississippi with his duties as the chief administrative officer of all courts of this state, including without limitation the task of insuring that the business of the courts of the state is attended with proper dispatch, that the dockets of such courts are not permitted to become congested and that trials and appeals of cases, civil and criminal, are not delayed unreasonably. (2)  The office shall also perform the following duties: (a)  To work with the clerks of all youth courts and civil and criminal trial courts in the state to collect, obtain, compile, digest and publish information and statistics concerning the administration of justice in the state. (b)  To serve as an agency to apply for and receive any grants or other assistance and to coordinate and conduct studies and projects to improve the administration of justice by the courts of the state, and it may conduct such studies with or without the assistance of consultants. (c)  To supply such support to the Judicial Advisory Study Committee necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, including without limitation, research and clerical assistance. (d)  To promulgate standards, rules and regulations for computer and/or electronic filing and storage of all court records and court-related records maintained throughout the state in courts and in offices of circuit and chancery clerks. (e)  It shall perform such other duties relating to the improvement of the administration of justice as may be assigned by the Supreme Court of Mississippi. SECTION 3.  Section 9-21-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-21-5.  The Administrative Director shall be appointed by and shall serve at the pleasure of the Supreme Court of Mississippi as the Director of the Administrative Office of Courts. The Administrative Director shall devote full time to the duties of the office to the exclusion of engagement in any other business or profession for profit. SECTION 4.  Section 9-21-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-21-7.  The Administrative Director, with the approval of the Supreme Court, is authorized to employ and set the compensation of such assistants and other employees as are necessary to enable him to perform his duties, subject to approval of the State Personnel Board. SECTION 5.  Section 9-21-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-21-9.  (1)  The Administrative Director of Courts shall have the following duties and authority with respect to all courts in addition to any other duties and responsibilities as may be properly assigned by the Supreme Court and/or by law: (a)  To require the filing of reports, the collection and compilation of statistical data and other information on the judicial and financial operation of the courts and on the operation of other offices directly related to and serving the courts; (b)  To determine the state of the dockets and evaluate the practices and procedures of the courts and make recommendations concerning the number of judges and other personnel required for the efficient administration of justice; (c)  To prescribe uniform administrative and business methods, systems, forms and records to be used in the offices of the clerks of courts; (d)  To devise, promulgate and require the use of a uniform youth court case tracking system, including a youth court case filing form for filing with each individual youth court matter, to be utilized by the Administrative Office of Courts and the youth courts in order that the number of youthful offenders, abused, neglected, truant and dependent children, as well as children in need of special care and children in need of supervision, may be tracked with specificity through the youth court and adult justice systems; in support of the uniform case docketing system, the director shall require that all youth courts utilize the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System (MYCIDS); (e)  To develop, promulgate and require the use of a statewide docket numbering system to be utilized by the youth courts, which youth court docket numbers shall standardize and unify the numbering system by which youth court docket numbers are assigned, such that each docket number would, among other things, identify the county and year in which a particular youth court action was commenced; (f)  To develop, promulgate and require the use of uniform youth court orders and forms in all youth courts and youth court proceedings; (g)  To prepare and submit budget recommendations for state appropriations necessary for the maintenance and operation of the judicial system and to authorize expenditures from funds appropriated for these purposes as permitted or authorized by law; (h)  To develop and implement personnel policies for nonjudicial personnel employed by the courts; (i)  To investigate, make recommendations concerning and assist in the securing of adequate physical accommodations for the judicial system; (j)  To procure, distribute, exchange, transfer and assign such equipment, books, forms and supplies as are acquired with state funds or grant funds or otherwise for the judicial system; (k)  To make recommendations for the improvement of the operations of the judicial system; (l)  To prepare and submit an annual report on the work of the judicial system to the Supreme Court; (m)  To take necessary steps in the collection of unpaid court costs, fines and forfeitures; (n)  To perform such additional administrative duties relating to the improvement of the administration of justice as may be assigned by the Supreme Court; and (o)  To promulgate standards, rules and regulations for computer and/or electronic filing and storage of all court records and court-related records maintained throughout the state in courts and in offices of circuit and chancery clerks. (p)  To utilize the provisions of law that regulate public purchasing in Sections 31-7-1 et seq., to contract with a provider to effectuate the requirements of paragraph (d) for the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System (MYCIDS). (2)  (a)  The Administrative Director of Courts shall conduct an audit of the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System (MYCIDS), by August 1, 2024, to review:  the services provided by the system, any contractors or employees used to administer the system, the process used to design or administer the system, guidelines used to create the system and the primary functions of the system and whether the system can be accessed by users of the Mississippi Electronic Court System or merged with the Mississippi Electronic Court System. (b)  The Administrative Director of Courts shall provide a report to the Judiciary A Committees of the Mississippi House of Representatives and the Senate by September 1, 2024, that includes: (i)  A copy of the audit; (ii)  Recommendations that resolve any deficiencies in the system or improve the system; (iii) Recommendations that outline the creation of a new system which is to be in operation by July 1, 2026. (iv)  A list of the companies or agencies that have submitted bids to resolve deficiencies, make improvements or create a new system. SECTION 6.  Section 9-21-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-21-11.  (1)  The Administrative Director of Courts is authorized and empowered to:  study and apply for any and all applications for funds and grants directed to the office from any federal governmental agency or entity; disburse such aid, assistance, funds, monies, grants or subgrants; and coordinate the same with the overall administration of justice in Mississippi to assist or aid in the administration of justice, criminal or civil, or the improvement of courts and the judicial system. (2)  The courts of the state, regardless of the name they bear, shall be proper local units or entities of government to apply for and receive such assistance, aid, funds, monies, grants and subgrants. (3)  Grants to youth courts shall be made in accordance with Section 43-21-801. SECTION 7.  Section 9-21-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-21-13.  (1)  The Administrative Director of Courts shall coordinate the functions and duties of administrative personnel, including court administrators and court administrative aides to judges, to facilitate cooperation and so that the overall administration of justice may be accomplished with efficiency in all courts of the state. (2)  The Administrative Director of Courts is authorized to direct the expenditure of state monies appropriated to the Administrative Office of Courts or any courts of the state for any and all functions or projects directly or indirectly affecting the operation of any court and may transfer monies appropriated for the office or any account to any one or more other accounts or office. SECTION 8.  Section 9-21-14, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-21-14.  (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Comprehensive Electronic Court Systems Fund.  The purpose of the fund shall be to provide funding for the development, implementation and maintenance of a comprehensive case management and electronic filing system, one of the purposes of which will be to provide duplicate dockets and case files at remote sites.  The system will be designed to: (a)  Provide a framework for the seamless, transparent exchange of data among courts and with appropriate law enforcement, children's services and public welfare agencies. (b)  Allow judges and prosecutors to determine whether there are holds or warrants from other jurisdictions for defendants prior to release on bail or otherwise. (c)  Assist related agencies in tracking the court activity of individuals in all participating jurisdictions. (d)  Assist child protection and human services agencies to determine the status of children and caregivers in the participating jurisdictions. (e)  Duplicate and preserve court documents at remote sites so that they may be protected against catastrophic loss. (f)  Improve the ability of the Administrative Office of Courts and the state courts to handle efficiently monies flowing through the courts and to collect delinquent fees, fines and costs. (g)  Enable the state courts and clerks to generate management reports and analysis tools, allowing them to constantly track individual cases and the overall caseload. (h)  Provide a uniform system for docketing and tracking cases and to automatically generate status reports. (i)  Enable the Administrative Office of Courts to acquire statistical data promptly and efficiently. (j)  Make trial court and individual case dockets available to the public online through use of the Internet. (2)  Monies from the fund shall be distributed by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Administrative Office of Courts. (3)  The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal-year limitations, and shall consist of: (a)  Monies appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of funding the comprehensive case management and electronic filing system; (b)  The interest accruing to the fund; (c)  Monies received from the federal government; (d)  Donations; and (e)  Monies received from such other sources as may be provided by law. (4)  The Supreme Court may utilize and fund as a pilot program any case management and electronic filing system of the Three Rivers Planning and Development District or that of any county or vendor that complies with the data and case management and electronic filing policy standards adopted by the Supreme Court.  No statewide comprehensive case management and electronic system shall be implemented by the Mississippi Supreme Court unless such system is approved by the Legislature. SECTION 9.  Section 9-21-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-21-15.  The Administrative Director of Courts is authorized and empowered to employ consultants and consultant firms and to contract with the same for their services for reasonable compensation and as necessary to improve the administration of justice and the courts of the state.  The contracts with such consultants or consultant firms shall be considered as contracts for professional services. SECTION 10.  Section 9-21-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-21-17.  The Administrative Director of Courts and the Supreme Court are authorized to use the services of any member of the judiciary of any court and any court-supportive personnel, including, without limitation, court reporters, clerks, bailiffs, law clerks, court administrators, secretaries and employees in clerks' offices to carry out studies, projects and functions designed to improve or effect the efficient administration of justice and the operation of courts. SECTION 11.  Section 9-21-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-21-19.  All judges, clerks of court, and other officers or employees of the courts and of offices related to and serving the courts shall comply with all requests made by the Administrative Director for information and statistical data relative to the work of the courts and of such offices and relative to the expenditure of public monies for their maintenance and operation. SECTION 12.  Section 9-23-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-23-1.  This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Alyce Griffin Clarke Intervention Court Act." SECTION 13.  Section 9-23-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-23-3.  (1) The Legislature of Mississippi recognizes the critical need for judicial intervention to reduce the incidence of alcohol and drug use, alcohol and drug addiction, and crimes committed as a result of alcohol and drug use and alcohol and drug addiction.  It is the intent of the Legislature to facilitate local intervention court alternative orders adaptable to chancery, circuit, county, youth, municipal and justice courts. (2)  The goals of the intervention courts under this chapter include the following: (a)  To reduce alcoholism and other drug dependencies among adult and juvenile offenders and defendants and among respondents in juvenile petitions for abuse, neglect or both; (b)  To reduce criminal and delinquent recidivism and the incidence of child abuse and neglect; (c)  To reduce the alcohol-related and other drug-related court workload; (d)  To increase personal, familial and societal accountability of adult and juvenile offenders and defendants and respondents in juvenile petitions for abuse, neglect or both; (e)  To promote effective interaction and use of resources among criminal and juvenile justice personnel, child protective services personnel and community agencies; and (f)  To use corrections resources more effectively by redirecting prison-bound offenders whose criminal conduct is driven in part by drug and alcohol dependence to intensive supervision and clinical treatment available in the intervention court. SECTION 14.  Section 9-23-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-23-5.  For the purposes of this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Chemical" tests means the analysis of an individual's:  (i) blood, (ii) breath, (iii) hair, (iv) sweat, (v) saliva, (vi) urine, or (vii) other bodily substance to determine the presence of alcohol or a controlled substance. (b)  "Crime of violence" means an offense listed in Section 97-3-2. (c)  "Intervention court" means a drug court, mental health court, veterans court or problem-solving court that utilizes an immediate and highly structured intervention process for eligible defendants or juveniles that brings together mental health professionals, substance abuse professionals, local social programs and intensive judicial monitoring. (d)  "Evidence-based practices" means supervision policies, procedures and practices that scientific research demonstrates reduce recidivism. (e)  "Risk and needs assessment" means the use of an actuarial assessment tool validated on a Mississippi corrections population to determine a person's risk to reoffend and the characteristics that, if addressed, reduce the risk to reoffend. SECTION 15.  Section 9-23-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-23-7.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall be responsible for certification and monitoring of local intervention courts according to standards promulgated by the State Intervention Courts Advisory Committee. SECTION 16.  Section 9-23-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-23-9.  (1) The State Intervention Courts Advisory Committee is established to develop and periodically update proposed statewide evaluation plans and models for monitoring all critical aspects of intervention courts.  The committee must provide the proposed evaluation plans to the Chief Justice and the Administrative Office of Courts.  The committee shall be chaired by the Director of the Administrative Office of Courts or a designee of the director and shall consist of eleven (11) members all of whom shall be appointed by the Supreme Court.  The members shall be broadly representative of the courts, mental health, veterans affairs, law enforcement, corrections, criminal defense bar, prosecutors association, juvenile justice, child protective services and substance abuse treatment communities. (2)  The State Intervention Courts Advisory Committee may also make recommendations to the Chief Justice, the Director of the Administrative Office of Courts and state officials concerning improvements to intervention court policies and procedures including the intervention court certification process.  The committee may make suggestions as to the criteria for eligibility, and other procedural and substantive guidelines for intervention court operation. (3)  The State Intervention Courts Advisory Committee shall act as arbiter of disputes arising out of the operation of intervention courts established under this chapter and make recommendations to improve the intervention courts; it shall also make recommendations to the Supreme Court necessary and incident to compliance with established rules. (4)  The State Intervention Courts Advisory Committee shall establish through rules and regulations a viable and fiscally responsible plan to expand the number of adult and juvenile intervention court programs operating in Mississippi.  These rules and regulations shall include plans to increase participation in existing and future programs while maintaining their voluntary nature. (5)  The State Intervention Courts Advisory Committee shall receive and review the monthly reports submitted to the Administrative Office of Courts by each certified intervention court and provide comments and make recommendations, as necessary, to the Chief Justice and the Director of the Administrative Office of Courts. SECTION 17.  Section 9-23-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-23-11. (1)  The Administrative Office of Courts shall establish, implement and operate a uniform certification process for all intervention courts and other problem-solving courts including juvenile courts, veterans courts or any other court designed to adjudicate criminal actions involving an identified classification of criminal defendant to ensure funding for intervention courts supports effective and proven practices that reduce recidivism and substance dependency among their participants. (2) The Administrative Office of Courts shall establish a certification process that ensures any new or existing intervention court meets minimum standards for intervention court operation. (a) These standards shall include, but are not limited to: (i) The use of evidence-based practices including, but not limited to, the use of a valid and reliable risk and needs assessment tool to identify participants and deliver appropriate interventions; (ii) Targeting medium to high-risk offenders for participation; (iii) The use of current, evidence-based interventions proven to reduce dependency on drugs or alcohol, or both; (iv) Frequent testing for alcohol or drugs; (v) Coordinated strategy between all intervention court program personnel involving the use of graduated clinical interventions; (vi) Ongoing judicial interaction with each participant; and (vii) Monitoring and evaluation of intervention court program implementation and outcomes through data collection and reporting. (b) Intervention court certification applications shall include: (i) A description of the need for the intervention court; (ii) The targeted population for the intervention court; (iii) The eligibility criteria for intervention court participants; (iv) A description of the process for identifying appropriate participants including the use of a risk and needs assessment and a clinical assessment; (v) A description of the intervention court intervention components, including anticipated budget and implementation plan; (vi) The data collection plan which shall include collecting the following data: 1. Total number of participants; 2. Total number of successful participants; 3. Total number of unsuccessful participants and the reason why each participant did not complete the program; 4. Total number of participants who were arrested for a new criminal offense while in the intervention court program; 5. Total number of participants who were convicted of a new felony or misdemeanor offense while in the intervention court program; 6. Total number of participants who committed at least one (1) violation while in the intervention court program and the resulting sanction(s); 7. Results of the initial risk and needs assessment or other clinical assessment conducted on each participant; and 8. Total number of applications for screening by race, gender, offenses charged, indigence and, if not accepted, the reason for nonacceptance; and 9. Any other data or information as required by the Administrative Office of Courts. (c) Every intervention court shall be certified under the following schedule: (i) An intervention court application submitted after July 1, 2014, shall require certification of the intervention court based on the proposed drug court plan. (ii) An intervention court initially established and certified after July 1, 2014, shall be recertified after its second year of funded operation on a time frame consistent with the other certified courts of its type. (iii) A certified adult felony intervention court in existence on December 31, 2018, must submit a recertification petition by July 1, 2019, and be recertified under the requirements of this section on or before December 31, 2019; after the recertification, all certified adult felony intervention courts must submit a recertification petition every two (2) years to the Administrative Office of Courts.  The recertification process must be completed by December 31st of every odd calendar year. (iv) A certified youth, family, misdemeanor or chancery intervention court in existence on December 31, 2018, must submit a recertification petition by July 31, 2020, and be recertified under the requirements of this section by December 31, 2020.  After the recertification, all certified youth, family, misdemeanor and chancery intervention courts must submit a recertification petition every two (2) years to the Administrative Office of Courts.  The recertification process must be completed by December 31st of every even calendar year. (3) All certified intervention courts shall measure successful completion of the drug court based on those participants who complete the program without a new criminal conviction. (4) (a)  All certified drug courts must collect and submit to the Administrative Office of Courts each month, the following data: (i) Total number of participants at the beginning of the month; (ii) Total number of participants at the end of the month; (iii) Total number of participants who began the program in the month; (iv) Total number of participants who successfully completed the intervention court in the month; (v) Total number of participants who left the program in the month; (vi) Total number of participants who were arrested for a new criminal offense while in the intervention court program in the month; (vii) Total number of participants who were convicted for a new criminal arrest while in the intervention court program in the month; and (viii) Total number of participants who committed at least one (1) violation while in the intervention court program and any resulting sanction(s). (b) By August 1, 2015, and each year thereafter, the Administrative Office of Courts shall report to the PEER Committee the information in subsection (4)(a) of this section in a sortable, electronic format. (5) All certified intervention courts may individually establish rules and may make special orders and rules as necessary that do not conflict with the rules promulgated by the Supreme Court or the Administrative Office of Courts. (6) A certified intervention court may appoint the full- or part-time employees it deems necessary for the work of the intervention court and shall fix the compensation of those employees.  Such employees shall serve at the will and pleasure of the judge or the judge's designee. (7) The Administrative Office of Courts shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the certification and re-certification process and make any other policies not inconsistent with this section to carry out this process. (8)  A certified intervention court established under this chapter is subject to the regulatory powers of the Administrative Office of Courts as set forth in Section 9-23-17. SECTION 18.  Section 9-23-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-23-13.  (1)  An intervention court's alcohol and drug intervention component shall provide for eligible individuals, either directly or through referrals, a range of necessary court intervention services, including, but not limited to, the following: (a)  Screening using a valid and reliable assessment tool effective for identifying alcohol and drug dependent persons for eligibility and appropriate services; (b)  Clinical assessment; for a DUI offense, if the person has two (2) or more DUI convictions, the court shall order the person to undergo an assessment that uses a standardized evidence-based instrument performed by a physician to determine whether the person has a diagnosis for alcohol and/or drug dependence and would likely benefit from a court-approved medication-assisted treatment indicated and approved for the treatment of alcohol and/or drug dependence by the United States Food and Drug Administration, as specified in the most recent Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric Association.  Upon considering the results of the assessment, the court may refer the person to a rehabilitative program that offers one or more forms of court-approved medications that are approved for the treatment of alcohol and/or drug dependence by the United States Food and Drug Administration; (c)  Education; (d)  Referral; (e)  Service coordination and case management; and (f)  Counseling and rehabilitative care. (2)  Any inpatient treatment or inpatient detoxification program ordered by the court shall be certified by the Department of Mental Health, other appropriate state agency or the equivalent agency of another state. (3)  All intervention courts shall make available the option for participants to use court-approved medication-assisted treatment while participating in the programs of the court in accordance with the recommendations of the National Drug Court Institute. SECTION 19.  Section 9-23-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-23-15.  (1)  In order to be eligible for alternative sentencing through a local intervention court, the participant must satisfy each of the following criteria: (a)  The participant cannot have any felony convictions for any offenses that are crimes of violence as defined in Section 97-3-2 within the previous ten (10) years. (b)  The crime before the court cannot be a crime of violence as defined in Section 97-3-2. (c)  Other criminal proceedings alleging commission of a crime of violence cannot be pending against the participant. (d)  The participant cannot be charged with burglary of a dwelling under Section 97-17-23(2) or 97-17-37. (e)  The crime before the court cannot be a charge of driving under the influence of alcohol or any other drug or drugs that resulted in the death of a person. (f)  The crime charged cannot be one of trafficking in controlled substances under Section 41-29-139(f), nor can the participant have a prior conviction for same. (2)  Participation in the services of an alcohol and drug intervention component shall be open only to the individuals over whom the court has jurisdiction, except that the court may agree to provide the services for individuals referred from another intervention court.  In cases transferred from another jurisdiction, the receiving judge shall act as a special master and make recommendations to the sentencing judge. (3)  (a)  As a condition of participation in an intervention court, a participant may be required to undergo a chemical test or a series of chemical tests as specified by the intervention court.  A participant is liable for the costs of all chemical tests required under this section, regardless of whether the costs are paid to the intervention court or the laboratory; however, if testing is available from other sources or the program itself, the judge may waive any fees for testing. The judge may waive all fees if the applicant is determined to be indigent. (b)  A laboratory that performs a chemical test under this section shall report the results of the test to the intervention court. (4)  A person does not have a right to participate in intervention court under this chapter.  The court having jurisdiction over a person for a matter before the court shall have the final determination about whether the person may participate in intervention court under this chapter.  However, any person meeting the eligibility criteria in subsection (1) of this section shall, upon request, be screened for admission to intervention court. SECTION 20.  Section 9-23-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-23-17.  With regard to any intervention court, the Administrative Office of Courts shall do the following: (a)  Certify and re-certify intervention court applications that meet standards established by the Administrative Office of Courts in accordance with this chapter. (b)  Ensure that the structure of the intervention component complies with rules adopted under this section and applicable federal regulations. (c)  Revoke the authorization of a program upon a determination that the program does not comply with rules adopted under this section and applicable federal regulations. (d)  Make agreements and contracts to effectuate the purposes of this chapter with: (i)  Another department, authority or agency of the state; (ii)  Another state; (iii)  The federal government; (iv)  A state-supported or private university; or (v)  A public or private agency, foundation, corporation or individual. (e)  Directly, or by contract, approve and certify any intervention component established under this chapter. (f)  Require, as a condition of operation, that each intervention court created or funded under this chapter be certified by the Administrative Office of Courts. (g)  Collect monthly data reports submitted by all certified intervention courts, provide those reports to the State Intervention Courts Advisory Committee, compile an annual report summarizing the data collected and the outcomes achieved by all certified intervention courts and submit the annual report to the Oversight Task Force. (h)  Every three (3) years contract with an external evaluator to conduct an evaluation of the effectiveness of the intervention court program, both statewide and individual intervention court programs, in complying with the key components of the intervention courts adopted by the National Association of Drug Court Professionals. (i)  Adopt rules to implement this chapter. SECTION 21.  Section 9-23-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-23-19.  (1)  All monies received from any source by the intervention court shall be accumulated in a fund to be used only for intervention court purposes.  Any funds remaining in this fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into any general fund, but shall be retained in the Intervention Court Fund for the funding of further activities by the intervention court. (2)  An intervention court may apply for and receive the following: (a)  Gifts, bequests and donations from private sources. (b)  Grant and contract money from governmental sources. (c)  Other forms of financial assistance approved by the court to supplement the budget of the intervention court. (3)  The costs of participation in an alcohol and drug intervention program required by the certified intervention court may be paid by the participant or out of user fees or such other state, federal or private funds that may, from time to time, be made available. (4)  The court may assess such reasonable and appropriate fees to be paid to the local Intervention Court Fund for participation in an alcohol or drug intervention program; however, all fees may be waived if the applicant is determined to be indigent. SECTION 22.  Section 9-23-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-23-21.  The director and members of the professional and administrative staff of the intervention court who perform duties in good faith under this chapter are immune from civil liability for: (a)  Acts or omissions in providing services under this chapter; and (b)  The reasonable exercise of discretion in determining eligibility to participate in the intervention court. SECTION 23.  Section 9-23-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-23-23.  If the participant completes all requirements imposed upon him by the intervention court, including the payment of fines and fees assessed and not waived by the court, the charge and prosecution shall be dismissed.  If the defendant or participant was sentenced at the time of entry of plea of guilty, the successful completion of the intervention court order and other requirements of probation or suspension of sentence will result in the record of the criminal conviction or adjudication being expunged.  However, no expunction of any implied consent violation shall be allowed. SECTION 24.  Section 9-23-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-23-51.  There is created in the State Treasury a special interest-bearing fund to be known as the Drug Court Fund.  The purpose of the fund shall be to provide supplemental funding to all drug courts in the state.  Monies from the funds derived from assessments under Section 99-19-73 shall be distributed by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Administrative Office of Courts, pursuant to procedures set by the State Drug Courts Advisory Committee to assist both juvenile drug courts and adult drug courts.  Funds from other sources shall be distributed to the drug courts in the state based on a formula set by the State Drug Courts Advisory Committee.  The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal-year limitations, and shall consist of:  (a) monies appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of funding drug courts; (b) the interest accruing to the fund; (c) monies received under the provisions of Section 99-19-73; (d) monies received from the federal government; and (e) monies received from such other sources as may be provided by law. SECTION 25.  Section 9-25-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-25-1.  (1)  The Legislature recognizes that our military veterans have provided an invaluable service to our country.  In doing so, many may have suffered the effects of, including, but not limited to, post-traumatic stress disorder, traumatic brain injury and depression, and may also suffer drug and alcohol dependency or addiction and co-occurring mental illness and substance abuse problems.  As a result of this, some veterans come into contact with the criminal justice system and are charged with felony offenses.  There is a critical need for the justice system to recognize these veterans, provide accountability for their wrongdoing, provide for the safety of the public, and provide for the treatment of our veterans.  It is the intent of the Legislature to create a framework for which specialized veterans treatment courts may be established at the circuit court level and at the discretion of the circuit court judge. (2)  Authorization. A circuit court judge may establish a Veterans Treatment Court program.  The Veterans Treatment Court may, at the discretion of the circuit court judge, be a separate court program or as a component of an existing intervention court program.  At the discretion of the circuit court judge, the Veterans Treatment Court may be operated in one (1) county within the circuit court district, and allow veteran participants from all counties within the circuit court district to participate. (3)  Eligibility. (a)  In order to be eligible to participate in a Veterans Treatment Court program established under this section, the attorney representing the state must consent to the defendant's participation in the program.  Further, the court in which the criminal case is pending must have found that the defendant is a veteran of the United States Armed Forces as defined in Title 38 USCS. (b)  Participation in the services of an alcohol and drug intervention component shall only be open to the individuals over whom the court has jurisdiction, except that the court may agree to provide the services for individuals referred from another Veterans Treatment Court.  In cases transferred from another jurisdiction, the receiving judge shall act as a special master and make recommendations to the sentencing judge. (c)  (i)  As a condition of participation in a Veterans Treatment Court, a participant may be required to undergo a chemical test or a series of chemical tests as specified by the Veterans Treatment Court program.  A participant may be held liable for costs associated with all chemical tests required under this section.  However, a judge may waive any fees for testing. (ii)  A laboratory that performs chemical tests under this section shall report the results of the tests to the Veterans Treatment Courts. (d)  A person does not have the right to participate in a Veterans Treatment Court program under this chapter.  The court having jurisdiction over a person for a matter before the court shall have the final determination about whether the person may participate in the Veterans Treatment Court program. (e)  A defendant shall be excluded from participating in a Veterans Treatment Court program if any one (1) of the following applies: (i)  The crime before the court is a crime of violence as set forth in paragraph (c) of this subsection. (ii)  The defendant does not demonstrate a willingness to participate in a treatment program. (iii)  The defendant has been previously convicted of a felony crime of violence including, but not limited to:  murder, rape, sexual battery, statutory rape of a child under the age of sixteen (16), armed robbery, arson, aggravated kidnapping, aggravated assault, stalking, or any offense involving the discharge of a firearm or where serious bodily injury or death resulted to any person. (f)  The court in which the criminal case is pending shall allow an eligible defendant to choose whether to proceed through the Veterans Treatment Court program or otherwise through the justice system. (g)  Proof of matters under this section may be submitted to the court in which the criminal case is pending in any form the court determines to be appropriate, including military service and medical records, previous determinations of a disability by a veteran's organization or by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, testimony or affidavits of other veterans or service members, and prior determinations of eligibility for benefits by any state or county veterans office. (4)  Administrative Office of Courts.  With regard to any Veterans Treatment Court established under this chapter, the Administrative Office of Courts may do the following: (a)  Ensure that the structure of the intervention component complies with rules adopted under this chapter and applicable federal regulations. (b)  Revoke the authorization of a program upon a determination that the program does not comply with rules adopted under this chapter and applicable federal regulations. (c)  Enter into agreements and contracts to effectuate the purposes of this chapter with: (i)  Another department, authority, or agency of the state; (ii)  Another state; (iii)  The federal government; (iv)  A state-supported or private university; or (v)  A public or private agency, foundation, corporation, or individual. (d)  Directly, or by contract, approve and certify any intervention component established under this chapter. (e)  Require, as a condition of operation, that each veterans court created or funded under this chapter be certified by the Administrative Office of Courts. (f)  Adopt rules to implement this chapter. (5)  State Intervention Court Advisory Committee.  (a)  The State Intervention Court Advisory Committee shall be responsible for developing statewide rules and policies as they relate to Veterans Treatment Court programs. (b)  The State Intervention Court Advisory Committee may also make recommendations to the Chief Justice, the Director of the Administrative Office of Courts and state officials concerning improvements to Veterans Treatment Court policies and procedures. (c)  The State Intervention Court Advisory Committee shall act as an arbiter of disputes arising out of the operation of Veterans Treatment Court programs established under this chapter and make recommendations to improve the Veterans Treatment Court programs. (6)  Funding for Veterans Treatment Courts.  (a)  All monies received from any source by the Veterans Treatment Court program shall be accumulated in a fund to be used only for Veterans Treatment Court purposes.  Any funds remaining in this fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse into the General Fund, but shall be retained in the Veterans Treatment Court fund for the funding of further activities by the Veterans Treatment Court program. (b)  A Veterans Treatment Court program may apply for and receive the following: (i)  Gifts, bequests and donations from private sources. (ii)  Grant and contract money from governmental sources. (iii)  Other forms of financial assistance approved by the court to supplement the budget of the Veterans Treatment Court program. (7)  Immunity. The coordinator and members of the professional and administrative staff of the Veterans Treatment Court program who perform duties in good faith under this chapter are immune from civil liability for: (a)  Acts or omissions in providing services under this chapter; and (b)  The reasonable exercise of discretion in determining eligibility to participate in the Veterans Treatment Court program. (8)  This section shall be codified as a separate article in Title 9, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 26.  Section 9-27-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-27-1.  This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Rivers McGraw Mental Health Treatment Court Act." SECTION 27.  Section 9-27-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-27-3.  (1)  The Legislature recognizes the critical need for judicial intervention to establish court processes and procedures that are more responsive to the needs of defendants with mental illnesses, while maintaining public safety and the integrity of the court process. (2)  The goals of the mental health treatment courts under this chapter include the following: (a)  Reduce the number of future criminal justice contacts among offenders with mental illnesses; (b)  Reduce the inappropriate institutionalization of people with mental illnesses; (c)  Improve the mental and behavioral health and well-being of defendants who come in contact with the criminal justice system; (d)  Improve linkages between the criminal justice system and the mental health system; (e)  Expedite case processing; (f)  Protect public safety; (g)  Establish linkages with other state and local agencies and programs that target people with mental illnesses in order to maximize the delivery of services; and (h)  To use corrections resources more effectively by redirecting prison-bound offenders whose criminal conduct is driven in part by mental illnesses to intensive supervision and clinical treatment available in the mental health treatment court. SECTION 28.  Section 9-27-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-27-5.  For the purposes of this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Behavioral health" means the promotion of mental health, resilience and wellbeing; the treatment of mental and substance use disorders; and the support of those who experience and/or are in recovery from these conditions, along with their families and communities. (b)  "Chemical tests" means the analysis of an individual's:  (i) blood, (ii) breath, (iii) hair, (iv) sweat, (v) saliva, (vi) urine, or (vii) other bodily substance to determine the presence of alcohol or a controlled substance. (c)  "Clinical assessment" means the use of an actuarial assessment tool which evaluates an individual's physical, medical, cognitive, psychological (personality, emotions, beliefs and attitudes), and behavioral history and current conditions in order to determine the presence and severity of any mental health disorder. (d)  "Co-occurring disorder" means coexistence of both a mental health and a substance use disorder as defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual (DSM). (e)  "Diagnostic and Statistical Manual (DSM)" is the publication by the American Psychiatric Association used by behavioral health professionals for the classification and diagnosing of mental health disorders. (f)  "Evidence-based practices" means practices which have been empirically researched and proven to have measurable positive outcomes; have been rigorously tested; have yielded consistent, replicable results; and have proven safe, beneficial and effective for a specific population. (g)  "Mental health" means a state of mental or emotional well-being that enables people to cope with the stresses of life, realize their abilities, learn, work well, and contribute to their community. (h)  "Mental health disorder" means a syndrome characterized by a clinically significant disturbance in an individual's cognition, emotion regulation or behavior that reflects a dysfunction in the psychological, biological or developmental process underlying mental functioning as defined by the current Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders as published by the American Psychiatric Association. (i)  "Mental Health Treatment program" means a highly structured evidence-based program for mental and behavioral health treatment of defendants that: (i)  Brings together mental health professionals, local social programs and intensive judicial monitoring; (ii)  Follows the key components of the mental health treatment court curriculum published by the Bureau of Justice Assistance; and (iii)  Utilizes supervision, policies, procedures and practices that scientific research demonstrates reduces recidivism. (j)  "Risk and needs assessment" means an actuarial evaluation tool to guide decision making at various points across the criminal justice continuum by approximating an individual's likelihood of reoffending and determining what individual criminogenic needs must be addressed to reduce that likelihood. Criminogenic risk and needs assessment tools consist of questions that are designed to ascertain someone's history of criminal behavior, attitudes and personality, and life circumstances. (k)  "Risk and needs screening" means the use of a brief actuarial tool that is used to determine a defendant's eligibility of a mental health treatment court by measuring the criminogenic risk and needs, identifying risk and protective factors, supports development of case management plan goals and determines the need of a full risk and needs assessment. (l)  "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that the individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems such as impaired control, social impairment, risky behaviors, and pharmacological tolerance and withdrawal. SECTION 29.  Section 9-27-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-27-7.  (1)  The Administrative Office of Courts is the repository for reports filed by mental health treatment courts established under this chapter.  The goal of the mental health treatment courts is to support effective and proven practices that reduce recidivism and provide behavioral health treatment for participants. (2)  Mental health treatment courts must adhere to the standards established in this chapter. (a)  These standards shall include, but are not limited to: (i)  The use of evidence-based practices including, but not limited to, the use of a valid and reliable risk and needs screening tool to identify participants,  deliver appropriate treatments and services; (ii)  Targeting moderate to high-risk offenders for participation; (iii)  Utilizing current, evidence-based practices proven effective for behavioral health treatment; (iv)  Frequent testing for alcohol or drugs; (v)  Coordinated strategy between all mental health treatment court personnel; (vi)  Ongoing judicial interaction with each participant; and (vii)  Monitoring and evaluation of mental health treatment court implementation and outcomes through data collection and reporting. (b)  Mental health treatment courts must implement a data collection plan, utilizing the treatment court case management system, which shall include collecting the following data: (i)  Total number of participants; (ii)  Total number of successful participants; (iii)  Total number of unsuccessful participants and the reason why each participant did not complete the program; (iv)  Total number of participants who were arrested for a new criminal offense while in the mental health treatment court; (v)  Total number of participants who were convicted of a new felony offense while in the mental health treatment court; (vi)  Total number of participants who committed at least one (1) violation while in the mental health treatment court and the resulting sanction(s); (vii)  Results of the initial risk and needs screening or other clinical assessments conducted on each participant; (viii)  Total number of applications for screening by race, gender, offenses charged, indigence and if not accepted, the reason for nonacceptance; and (ix)  Any other data or information as required by the Administrative Office of Courts. (3)  All mental health treatment courts must measure successful completion of the program based on those participants who complete the program without a new criminal conviction. (4)  (a)  Mental health treatment courts must collect and submit to the Administrative Office of Courts each month, the following data: (i)  Total number of participants at the beginning of the month; (ii)  Total number of participants at the end of the month; (iii)  Total number of new participants who began the program in the month; (iv)  Total number of participants who successfully completed the program in the month; (v)  Total number of participants who left the program in the month; (vi)  Total number of participants who were arrested for a new criminal offense while in the program in the month; (vii)  Total number of participants who were convicted of a new criminal offense while in the program in the month; (viii)  Total number of participants who committed at least one (1) violation while in the program and any resulting sanction(s); (ix)  Total number of active participants who did not receive treatment in the month; (x)  Total number of participants on prescribed psychotropic medications in the month; (xi)  Total number of new participants admitted to an acute psychiatric facility or a crisis stabilization unit in the first thirty (30) days of acceptance into the mental health treatment court; and (xii)  Total number of participants admitted to an acute psychiatric facility or a crisis stabilization unit in the month. (b)  By August 1, 2023, and each year thereafter, the Administrative Office of Courts shall report to the PEER Committee the information in subsection (4)(a) of this section in a sortable, electronic format. (5)  A certified mental health treatment court may individually establish rules and may make special orders and rules as necessary that do not conflict with rules promulgated by the Supreme Court or the Administrative Office of Courts. (6)  A certified mental health treatment court may appoint full- or part-time employees it deems necessary for the work of the mental health treatment court and shall fix the compensation of those employees, who shall serve at the will and pleasure of the circuit court judge who presides over the mental health treatment court. (7)  A certified mental health treatment court established under this chapter is subject to the regulatory powers of the Administrative Office of Courts as set forth in Section 9-27-13. SECTION 30.  Section 9-27-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-27-9.  (1)  Any mental and behavioral health treatment provider directly administering services to a participant shall be licensed by the appropriate state licensing board or hold a current and valid certification by the State Department of Mental Health or other appropriate state agency. (2)  A mental health treatment court shall provide either directly or through referrals, a range of services, including, but not limited to, the following: (a)  Screenings using a valid and reliable screening tool effective for identifying individuals with mental and behavioral health issues for eligibility and appropriate services; (b)  Clinical assessment; (c)  Referral to appropriate level of treatment services; (d)  Counseling and treatment for co-occurring substance use disorders; (e)  Employment Services; (f)  Education and/or vocational services; and (g)  Community service coordination, care and support. SECTION 31.  Section 9-27-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-27-11.  (1)  In order to be eligible for alternative sentencing through a local mental health treatment court, the defendant must satisfy each of the following criteria: (a)  The defendant cannot have any felony convictions for any offenses that are crimes of violence as defined in Section 97-3-2, other than burglary under Section 97-17-23(1), within the previous ten (10) years. (b)  The crime before the court cannot be a crime of violence as defined in Section 97-3-2, other than burglary under Section 97-17-23(1). (c)  Other criminal proceedings alleging commission of a crime of violence other than burglary under Section 97-17-23(1) cannot be pending against the defendant. (d)  The crime before the court cannot be a charge of driving under the influence of alcohol or any other substance that resulted in the death of a person.  In addition, defendants who are ineligible for nonadjudication under Section 63-11-30 shall be ineligible to participate in a mental health treatment court. (e)  The crime charged cannot be one of trafficking in controlled substances under Section 41-29-139(f), nor can the defendant have a prior conviction for the same. (2)  Participation in the services of a mental health treatment component court shall be open only to the defendant over whom the court has jurisdiction, except that the court may agree to provide the services for participants referred from another mental health treatment court.  In cases transferred from another jurisdiction, the receiving judge shall act as a special master and make recommendations to the sentencing judge. (3)  (a)  As a condition of participation in a mental health treatment court, a defendant shall be required to undergo chemical testing as specified by the program.  A participant is liable for the costs of all chemical tests required under this section, regardless of whether the costs are paid to the mental health treatment court or the laboratory; however, if testing is available from other sources or the program itself, the judge may waive any fees for testing.  Fees may be waived if the defendant is determined by the court to be indigent. (b)  A laboratory that performs a chemical test under this section shall report the results of the test to the mental health treatment court. (4)  A defendant does not have a right to participate in a mental health treatment court under this chapter.  The court having jurisdiction over a defendant for a matter before the court shall have the final determination about whether the defendant may participate in the mental health treatment court under this chapter.  However, any defendant meeting the eligibility criteria in subsection (1) of this section, shall, upon request, be screened for admission into the court's program. SECTION 32.  Section 9-27-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-27-13.  With regard to any mental health treatment court, the Administrative Office of Courts shall do the following: (a)  Certify and re-certify mental health treatment court applications that meet with standards established by the Administrative Office of Courts in accordance with this chapter. (b)  Ensure that the structure of the mental health treatment court complies with rules adopted under this section and applicable federal regulations. (c)  Revoke certification of a mental health treatment court upon a determination that the program does not comply with rules adopted under this section and applicable federal regulations. (d)  Make agreements and contracts to effectuate the purposes of this chapter with: (i)  Another department, authority or agency of the state; (ii)  Another state; (iii)  The federal government; (iv)  A state-supported or private institute of higher learning; or (v)  A public or private agency, foundation, corporation or individual. (e)  Directly, or by contract, approve and certify any mental health treatment court component established under this chapter. (f)  Require, as a condition of operation, that each mental health treatment court created or funded under this chapter be certified by the Administrative Office of Courts. (g)  Collect monthly data from each certified mental health treatment court and compile an annual report summarizing the data collected and the outcomes achieved. (h)  Every three (3) years, if funding is available, contract with an external evaluator to conduct an evaluation of the compliance with the Bureau of Justice Assistance key components, as adapted for mental health treatment courts, and effectiveness of: (i)  Statewide mental health treatment court program; and (ii)  Individual mental health treatment courts. (i)  Adopt rules to implement this chapter. SECTION 33.  Section 9-27-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-27-15.  (1)  All monies received from any source by a mental health treatment court shall be accumulated in a local fund to be used only for mental health treatment court purposes.  Any funds remaining in a local fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into any general fund, but shall be retained in the mental health treatment court fund for the funding of further activities by the mental health treatment court. (2)  A mental health treatment court may apply for and receive the following: (a)  Gifts, bequests and donations from private sources; (b)  Grant and contract monies from governmental sources; or (c)  Other forms of financial assistance approved by the court to supplement the budget of the mental health treatment court. (3)  The costs of participation required by the mental health treatment court may be paid by the participant or out of user fees or such other state, federal or private funds that may, from time to time, be made available. (4)  The mental health treatment court may assess reasonable and appropriate fees to be paid to the local mental health treatment court fund for participation in a mental health treatment court; however, all fees may be waived by the court if the defendant is determined by the court to be indigent. SECTION 34.  Section 9-27-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-27-17.  The mental health treatment court coordinator and members of the professional and administrative staff of the mental health treatment court who perform duties in good faith under this chapter are immune from civil liability for: (a)  Acts or omissions in providing services under this chapter; and (b)  The reasonable exercise of discretion in determining eligibility to participate in the mental health court. SECTION 35.  Section 9-27-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-27-19.  If the participant completes all requirements imposed by the mental health treatment court, the charge and prosecution shall be dismissed.  If the defendant was sentenced at the time of entry of a plea of guilty, the successful completion of the mental health treatment court order and other requirements of probation or suspension of sentence will result in the record of the criminal conviction or adjudication being expunged.  However, no expunction of any implied consent violations shall be allowed. SECTION 36.  Section 9-27-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-27-21. (1)  The Administrative Office of Courts shall be responsible for certification and monitoring of mental health treatment courts. (2)  The Administrative Office of Courts shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the certification and re-certification process and make any other policies consistent with this section to carry out this process. (3)  The Administrative Office of Courts shall establish, implement and operate a uniform certification process for all mental health treatment courts designed to adjudicate criminal actions involving an identified classification of criminal defendants to ensure funding for mental health treatment courts which supports effective and proven behavioral health treatment practices that reduce recidivism among their participants. (4) (a)  The Administrative Office of Courts shall establish a certification process that ensures any new or existing mental health treatment court meets standards for mental health treatment court operation. (b) Mental health treatment court certification application must include: (i) A description of the need for the mental health treatment court; (ii) The targeted population for the mental health treatment court; (iii) The eligibility criteria for mental health treatment court participants; (iv) A description of the process for identifying eligible participants, using a risk and needs screening and a clinical assessment which focuses on accepting moderate to high-risk individuals; and (v) A description of the mental health treatment court components, including anticipated budget, implementation plan, and a list of the evidence-based programs to which participants will be referred by the mental health treatment court. (5)  Every mental health treatment court shall be certified under the following schedule: (a) All certified mental health treatment courts in existence on December 31, 2022, must submit a recertification petition to the Administrative Office of Courts before July 1, 2023.  The mental health treatment court must submit a recertification petition every two (2) years. (b) A mental health treatment court's certification expires on December 31 of every odd calendar year. (6)  A certified mental health treatment court established under this chapter is subject to the regulatory powers of the Administrative Office of Courts as set forth in Section 9-27-13. SECTION 37.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.